New York, session 2025-2026, S3987.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2801-i to read as follows: 3 § 2801-i. Medical resident training; certain required training. 1. 4 Any hospital which receives any reimbursement pursuant to the provisions 5 of this article and which offers allopathic or osteopathic medical resi- 6 dent training in obstetrics, gynecology, internal medicine or women's 7 health shall provide training that follows the Accreditation Council on 8 Graduate Medical Education or the American Osteopathic Association 9 special requirements for obstetrics-gynecology. The program shall 10 provide a structured didactic and clinical training experience in all 11 methods of family planning. Topics shall include all reversible methods 12 of contraception, including natural methods, as well as sterilization. 13 The program shall include experience in management of complications as 14 well as training in the performance of these procedures. Such education 15 can be provided outside the institution, in an appropriate facility, 16 under the supervision of appropriately trained faculty. 17 2. Experience with induced abortion shall be part of residency train- 18 ing, except for residents with moral or religious objections. Such 19 education can be provided outside the institution. Experience with 20 management of complications of abortion shall be provided to all resi- 21 dents. If a residency program has a religious, moral or legal 22 restriction which prohibits the residents from performing abortions 23 within the institution, the program shall insure that the residents 24 receive a satisfactory education and experience managing the compli- 25 cations of abortion. Furthermore, such residency programs shall have EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02759-01-5 S. 3987 2 1 mechanisms which insure that residents in their program who do not have 2 a religious or moral objection receive education and experience in 3 performing abortion at another institution. 4 3. Any hospital which fails to follow the provisions of this section 5 shall be ineligible for reimbursement under the provisions of this arti- 6 cle. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of September next 8 succeeding the date on which it shall have become a law.